Tennessee, session 114, SB2703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 677 of the Private Acts of 1949, as amended by Chapter 434 of
the Private Acts of 1968, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting
SECTION 1 and substituting:
SECTION 1. That there is hereby created the office of County Attorney for
Hamblen County. The County Attorney shall be elected by the Hamblen County
Commission annually at the September meeting designated for the election of
County Attorney.
SECTION 2. Chapter 677 of the Private Acts of 1949, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting SECTION 2 and substituting:
SECTION 2. [Deleted by 2026 amendment]
SECTION 3. Chapter 677 of the Private Acts of 1949, as amended by Chapter 434 of
the Private Acts of 1968, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting
SECTION 3 and substituting:
SECTION 3. The County Attorney for services, shall be paid an annual retainer
fee of Twelve Hundred Dollars ($1200), payable in equal monthly installments
out of the general funds of the County, by warrant of the County Judge or
Chairman upon the trustee. For legal services performed on behalf of the
County, the County Attorney shall be entitled to receive additional reasonable
compensation and reimbursement for actual expenses incurred. All
compensation and reimbursement are subject to review by the County
SB2703
010798
- 1 -

Legislative Body through the Consent Calendar. Claims for expenses shall be
itemized and certified by the County Attorney, upon standard County financial
policies, shall be paid in the same manner as the retainer and other fees.
SECTION 4. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Hamblen County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 5. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 4.
- 2 - 010798